Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1418
Joint debtors not originally summoned made judgment debtors.

When a judgment is recovered against one or more persons jointly indebted upon contract, those who were not originally summoned may be made parties to the judgment by action.

R.S.1867, Code § 471, p. 472;

R.S.1913, § 8039;

C.S.1922, § 8980;

C.S.1929, § 20-1418;

R.S.1943, § 25-1418.

Where revivor of dormant judgment was had, want of jurisdiction in obtaining original judgment on joint promissory note could not be raised by injunction. Haynes v. Aultman, Miller & Co., 36 Neb. 257, 54 N.W. 511 (1893).